src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-aqilw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../generator-gt-norm.hfstol
    Morph: ../../analyser-gt-norm.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - ailõ: # Verb 51 'eng /est joosta/fin' - full paradigm
     ailõ+V+Inf: ailõ
     ailõ+V+Ger: ailõs
     ailõ+V+Sup: ailõm
     ailõ+V+Sup+Ine: ailõmõs
     ailõ+V+Sup+Ela: ailõmõst
     ailõ+V+Sup+Tra: ailõmõks
     ailõ+V+Sup+Abe: ailõmõt
     ailõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ailõb
     ailõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: ailõt
     ailõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: ailõbõd
     ailõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: ailiz
     ailõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [ailizt, ailiztõ]
     ailõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [ailizt, ailiztõ]
     ailõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: ail
     ailõ+V+Cond+Sg3: ailõks
     ailõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: ail
     ailõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: ail
     ailõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: ailõgid
     ailõ+V+Jus+Sg3: ailõg
     ailõ+V+Quo+Sg3: ailiji
     ailõ+V+ActPrfPrc: ailõn
     ailõ+V+PssPrfPrc: aildõd
